Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2193.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Sections 1 through 8, and amendments thereto, shall be
known and may be cited as the every mom matters act.
(b) The legislature declares that the purpose of the every mom
matters act is to:
(1) Give pregnant women and parents access to support services and
resources to promote healthy pregnancies and childbirths, provide
information on adoption and increase access to resources that promote
family and child development.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 1 through 8, and amendments thereto:
(a) "Abortion" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 65-6701, and
amendments thereto;
(b) "abortion provider" means an entity that:
(1) Performs abortions;
(2) receives moneys from the performance of abortions;
(3) advertises, makes referrals for or otherwise arranges for the
performance abortions; or
(4) operates a facility where abortions are performed;
(c) "department" means the department of health and environment;
(d) "program" means the every mom matters program established in
section 3, and amendments thereto; and
(e) "secretary" means the secretary of health and environment.
Sec. 3. (a) There is established the every mom matters program to be
administered by the secretary of health and environment.
(b) The every mom matters program shall make the following support
services available to participants in the program:
(1) Assistance in assessing and evaluating the needs of the participant
related to a pregnancy or parenting;

HB 2193 2
(2) providing medically accurate pregnancy-related information,
including, but not limited to, educational materials on pregnancy health,
obstetric care, what to expect in the birth process, how to communicate
with medical providers and postpartum care;
(3) assistance in obtaining medical coverage, obstetric care, primary
healthcare, mental or behavioral health counseling, substance abuse
treatment, postpartum care and pediatric care;
(4) providing information on the adoption process in this state;
(5) providing educational information on life skills, parenting skills,
job skills, decision making, healthy relationships and the success
sequence;
(6) assistance in developing a care plan for support during pregnancy
and post-childbirth parenting;
(7) assistance in obtaining employment or entering into a job training
program;
(8) making referrals on behalf of participants to the appropriate local
charitable organizations and to the appropriate agencies for federal and
state benefits programs;
(9) assistance in applying for federal and state benefits programs;
(10) assistance in obtaining support and resources if the participant is
a victim of abuse, assault, sexual assault, neglect, coercion or human
trafficking; and
(11) any other services available to participants that further the
purposes of this act.
(c) The state treasurer shall enter into agreements with one or more
eligible contractors to provide the support services and resources required
under the every mom matters program.
(d) Each contractor shall be:
(1) Registered to do business in this state and in good standing; and
(2) a nonprofit organization.
(e) No organization shall be eligible to be a contractor under the
program if such organization is an abortion provider or an affiliate of an
abortion provider.
(f) Each contractor shall:
(1) Make services available to participants through a telephonic
system or other synchronous audio or video technology and may make
services available through in-person contact with participants; and
(2) develop and publish marketing materials designed to provide
awareness of adoption and the adoption resources that are available in this
state.
Sec. 4. (a) To be eligible to be accepted in the every mom matters
program, a person shall be:
(1) A resident of this state; and

HB 2193 3
(2) (A) The biological parent of an unborn child;
(B) an adoptive parent of a child under one year of age; or
(C) a parent of a person who is under 18 years of age and the
biological parent of an unborn child.
(b) Participants accepted into the program are eligible to continue
receiving support services and resources under the program for:
(1) Two years if the pregnancy related to the participant's eligibility
results in a live birth;
(2) six months if the pregnancy related to the participant's eligibility
results in a spontaneous miscarriage or stillbirth; or
(3) 15 days if the pregnancy related to the participant's eligibility
results in an induced termination of such pregnancy.
Sec. 5. (a) Each contractor shall record the following information and
prepare and submit a report each month to the department:
(1) The number of participants who received any of the services
under section 3, and amendments thereto, during that month;
(2) the number and type of such services that were provided; and
(3) the number and type of referrals made on behalf of participants to
the appropriate local charitable organizations and to the appropriate
agencies for federal and state benefits programs during that month.
(b) Each contractor shall prepare and submit a report every six
months to the department regarding specific services provided to
individual participants. Such report shall include, if known;
(1) The date a pregnant participant:
(A) First obtained healthcare insurance coverage; and
(B) first visited a physician to obtain obstetric care; and
(2) whether the child of a pregnant participant was:
(A) Stillborn;
(B) born weighing less than 2,500 grams;
(C) born before 37 weeks gestation; or
(D) admitted to a neonatal intensive care unit.
(c) Information obtained by the secretary under this section shall be
confidential and shall not be disclosed in a manner that would reveal the
identity of any participant in the program. Information obtained by the
secretary under this section may be used only for statistical purposes. The
provisions of this subsection shall expire on July 1, 2030, unless the
legislature reviews and reenacts such provisions in accordance with K.S.A.
45-229, and amendments thereto, prior to July 1, 2030.
Sec. 6. (a) The state treasurer shall distribute moneys from the every
mom matters program fund to contractors with whom the state treasurer
has entered into an agreement with pursuant to section 3, and amendments
thereto, for the provision of those support services and resources required
to be provided by such contractor under such agreement. Such moneys

HB 2193 4
shall be distributed to each contractor based on the anticipated program
expenses of such contractor for the immediately succeeding quarter. Each
quarter the department shall reconcile the immediately preceding quarterly
distribution to each contractor with such contractor's actual program
expenses. The subsequent quarterly distribution to such contractor shall
then be adjusted accordingly based on such reconciliation.
(b) Each contractor shall only use moneys distributed pursuant to this
section for the following:
(1) Expenses necessary to provide the support services and resources
required by the agreement with the state treasurer;
(2) marketing expenses incurred by the contractor for marketing of
the support services and resources the contractor may provide; and
(3) administrative expenses and other indirect costs associated with
the program.
(c) There is created in the state treasury the every mom matters
program fund to be administered by the state treasurer. All expenditures
from the every mom matters program fund shall be made only for the
purposes of sections 1 through 8, and amendments thereto, and shall be
made in accordance with appropriation acts upon warrants of the director
of accounts and reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the state
treasurer, or the state treasurer's designee.
Sec. 7. (a) The state treasurer shall not condition participation by an
eligible contractor in the every mom matters program on a requirement
that such contractor, or any employee or agent thereof:
(1) Forfeit or otherwise waive the right to freedom of religion,
expression or association as guaranteed by the first amendment to the
constitution of the United States; or
(2) take any action to which such contractor, or employee or agent
thereof, has a conscientious objection.
(b) Nothing in sections 1 through 6, and amendments thereto, shall be
construed to prohibit, restrict or otherwise limit any contractor from
carrying out any other religious or sectarian services or programs that are
funded by other sources of revenue.
Sec. 8. Sections 1 through 7, and amendments thereto, are declared
severable. If any provision of sections 1 through 7, and amendments
thereto, or the application thereof to any person shall be held invalid, then
such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining provisions of
sections 1 through 7, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 9. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.